Louisiana, session 2026, HB150.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 18 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 33:7151, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 18. LOCAL INSURANCE PROGRAM; CAMERON PARISH
§7151. Local insurance program; Cameron Parish; creation
A. The governing authority of the parish of Cameron may establish, by
ordinance, a local insurance program, referred to in this Section as the "program",
to assist homeowners who reside within the parish with offsetting homeowners' and
flood insurance costs. The ordinance establishing the program shall provide for the
administration and management of the program. The ordinance shall also provide
for the adoption of rules and regulations to establish eligibility criteria to determine
which homeowners qualify for program assistance.
B. The parish governing authority may establish, by ordinance, a local
insurance fund to provide funding for the program. The parish governing authority
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 150 ENROLLED
may appropriate local parish funds to the local insurance fund. The parish governing
authority may also solicit and accept voluntary contributions and grants to carry out
the purposes of the program.
C. The program shall be modified or repealed as provided in the ordinance
establishing the program. If the program ceases to exist, all funds shall be
transferred to the general fund of the parish of Cameron.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.